Utah statutes.
78B-15-616.   Temporary order.

(1)  In a proceeding under this part, the tribunal shall issue a temporary order for support of a child if the order is appropriate and the individual ordered to pay support is:

(a)  a presumed father of the child;

(b)  petitioning to have his paternity adjudicated;

(c)  identified as the father through genetic testing under Section 78B-15-505;

(d)  an alleged father who has failed to submit to genetic testing;

(e)  shown by clear and convincing evidence to be the father of the child; or

(f)  the mother of the child.

(2)  A temporary tribunal order may include provisions for custody and visitation as provided by other laws of this state.

